ro-RO: Tipul de eliberare: Eliberare controlată; Eliberare prelungită; Acțiune rapidă; Eliberare treptată; Eliberare imediată; Eliberare lentă; Eliberare în timp; Solubil în apă; Altele
da: Udgivelsestype: Kontrolleret frigivelse; Forlænget frigivelse; Hurtigtvirkende; Gradvis frigivelse; Øjeblikkelig frigivelse; Langsom frigivelse; Tidsfrigivelse; Vandopløselig; Andet
zh-CN: 肥料释放的类型: 控释; 缓释; 速效; 逐步释放; 速释; 缓释; 定时释放; 水溶; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de liberação: Liberação controlada; Liberação prolongada; Ação rápida; Liberação gradual; Liberação imediata; Liberação lenta; Liberação temporizada; Solúvel em água; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta otpuštanja: Kontrolirano otpuštanje; Produljeno oslobađanje; Brzo djeluje; Postupno otpuštanje; Trenutno oslobađanje; Sporo otpuštanje; Vremensko otpuštanje; Topivo u vodi; Ostalo
zh-TW: 釋放類型: 控釋; 緩釋; 快速見效; 緩釋; 速釋; 緩釋; 長效; 水溶性; 其他
ja: リリースタイプ: 制御放出; 徐放性; 即効性; 段階的リリース; 即放性; ゆっくりリリース; タイムリリース; 水溶性; その他
fi: Julkaisutyyppi: Kontrolloitu vapautus; Pitkävaikutteinen; Nopeasti vaikuttava; Asteittainen vapautus; Välittömästi vapautuva; Hidas vapautus; Aikavapautus; Vesiliukoinen; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta izdaje: Nadzorovano sproščanje; Podaljšano sproščanje; Hitro delovanje; Postopno sproščanje; Takojšnje sproščanje; Počasno sproščanje; Časovna sprostitev; Vodotopno; Druga
it: Tipo di rilascio: rilascio controllato; Rilascio prolungato; Ad azione rapida; Rilascio graduale; Rilascio immediato; Rilascio lento; Rilascio temporizzato; Solubile in acqua; Altro
bg-BG: Тип освобождаване: Контролирано освобождаване; Удължено освобождаване; Бързо действие; Плавно освобождаване; Незабавно освобождаване; Бавно освобождаване; Освобождаване с времеви интервал; Водоразтворимо; Друго
sk-SK: Typ uvoľnenia: Kontrolované uvoľňovanie; S predĺženým uvoľňovaním; Rýchly účinok; Postupné uvoľňovanie; S okamžitým uvoľňovaním; Pomalé uvoľňovanie; S oneskoreným uvoľňovaním; Rozpustné vo vode; Iné
ru: Тип высвобождения: Контролируемый выпуск; Пролонгированное высвобождение; Быстродействующее; Постепенный выпуск; Мгновенное высвобождение; Медленный выпуск; Временный выпуск; Водорастворимое; Другое
de: Veröffentlichungstyp: Kontrollierte Freisetzung; Verzögerte Freisetzung; Schnell wirkend; Allmähliche Freisetzung; Sofortige Freisetzung; Langsame Freisetzung; Retard; Wasserlöslich; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de liberación: Liberación controlada; Liberación prolongada; Acción rápida; Liberación gradual; Liberación inmediata; Liberación lenta; Liberación prolongada; Soluble en agua; Otros
pl: Typ uwalniania: Uwalnianie kontrolowane; O przedłużonym uwalnianiu; Szybko działający; Uwalnianie stopniowe; O natychmiastowym uwalnianiu; Uwalnianie powolne; Uwalnianie czasowe; Rozpuszczalne w wodzie; Inne
el: Τύπος αποδέσμευσης: Ελεγχόμενη απελευθέρωση; Παρατεταμένης αποδέσμευσης; Ταχείας δράσης; Σταδιακή απελευθέρωση; Άμεσης αποδέσμευσης; Αργή απελευθέρωση; Απελευθέρωση χρόνου; Υδατοδιαλυτό; Άλλο
cs: Způsob uvolňování hnojiva: Řízené uvolňování; Prodloužené uvolňování; Rychlé uvolňování; Postupné uvolňování; Okamžité uvolňování; Pomalé uvolňování; Časované uvolňování; Rozpustné ve vodě; Jiné
vi: Loại phát hành: Giải phóng có kiểm soát; Giải phóng kéo dài; Phản ứng nhanh; Giải phóng dần dần; Giải phóng ngay lập tức; Giải phóng chậm; Giải phóng theo thời gian; Hòa tan trong nước; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de libertação: Libertação controlada; Libertação prolongada; Ação rápida; Liberação gradual; Libertação imediata; Liberação lenta; Liberação programada; Solúvel em água; Outro
lt-LT: Išleidimo tipas: Kontroliuojamas išleidimas; Prailginto atpalaidavimo; Greitai veikiantis; Laipsniškas išleidimas; Greito išleidimo; Lėtas išleidimas; Išleidimas pagal laiką; Tirpus vandenyje; Kita
fr: Type de libération: Libération contrôlée; Libération prolongée; Action rapide; Libération progressive; Libération immédiate; Libération lente; Libération prolongée; Soluble dans l’eau; Autre
nl: Type afgifte: Gereguleerde afgifte; Verlengde afgifte; Snel handelen; Geleidelijke afgifte; Onmiddellijke afgifte; Langzame afgifte; Vertraagde afgifte; Wateroplosbaar; Overig
sv: Frisättningstyp: Kontrollerad frisättning; Förlängd frisättning; Snabbt agerande; Gradvis frisättning; Omedelbar frisättning; Långsam frisättning; Tidsfrigöring; Vattenlöslig; Övrigt
en: Release type: Controlled release; Extended release; Fast acting; Gradual release; Immediate release; Slow release; Time release; Water soluble; Other
tr: Salım türü: Kontrollü salım; Yavaş salınımlı; Hızlı tepkili; Kademeli salım; Hızlı salınımlı; Yavaş salım; Zaman ayarlı salım; Suda çözünür; Diğer
th: ประเภทการปลดปล่อยธาตุอาหาร: การปล่อยแบบควบคุม; ออกฤทธิ์นาน; ออกฤทธิ์เร็ว; การปล่อยแบบค่อยเป็นค่อยไป; ออกฤทธิ์ทันที; การปล่อยแบบช้าๆ; การปล่อยตามเวลา; ละลายน้ำได้; อื่นๆ
nb: Type frigjøring: Kontrollert frigjøring; Forlenget frigivelse; Hurtigvirkning; Gradvis frigjøring; Umiddelbar frigivelse; Langsom utløsning; Tidsutgivelse; Vannløselig; Annet
hu: Kiadás típusa: Szabályozott kibocsátás; Elnyújtott hatású; Gyors hatású; Fokozatos kibocsátás; Azonnali hatóanyag-leadás; Lassú kibocsátás; Időzített kibocsátás; Vízben oldható; Egyéb
ko: 방출 방식: 제어형 방출; 서방형; 빠른 행동; 점진적 방출; 속방형; 지속성 방출; 시간 차방출; 수용성; 기타